District of Columbia statutes.
47-2884.15

Sale of pawn or pledge—Disposition of surplus moneys.

The surplus money from the sale, after deducting the amount of the loan, the interest then due on the loan, and the expenses of the notice and sale, shall be paid over by the pawnbroker to the person who would have been entitled to redeem the pledge had the sale not taken place.

History

Aug. 6, 1956, 70 Stat. 1042, ch. 970, § 15
Mar. 13, 1985, D.C. Law 5-137,§ 2(c), 31 DCR 5743
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 302, 59 DCR 6190

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-1915.
1973 Ed., § 2-2015.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 19-171 enacted this subchapter into law.